Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.040

Temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction—Bond required.

A temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction shall not issue under this chapter except upon the giving of a bond or security by the applicant, in the sum that the court deems proper, but not less than one thousand dollars, for the payment of such costs and damages as may be incurred or suffered by any party who is found to have been wrongfully restrained or enjoined. A bond or security shall not be required of the state of Washington, municipal corporations, or political subdivisions of the state of Washington.

[ 1988 c 141 s 7.]